Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.105

Sexually violating human remains.

(1) Any person who has sexual intercourse or sexual contact with a dead human body is guilty of a class C felony.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) "Sexual intercourse" (i) has its ordinary meaning and occurs upon any penetration, however slight; and (ii) also means any penetration of the vagina or anus however slight, by an object, when committed on a dead human body, except when such penetration is accomplished as part of a procedure authorized or required under chapter 68.50 RCW or other law; and (iii) also means any act of sexual contact between the sex organs of a person and the mouth or anus of a dead human body.

(b) "Sexual contact" means any touching by a person of the sexual or other intimate parts of a dead human body done for the purpose of gratifying the sexual desire of the person.

[ 1994 c 53 s 1.]